Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6501
Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6501 to 77-6523 shall be known and may be cited as the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 44.